Alaska statutes. Title 1. General Provisions.
Article 3. Effect and Effective Date of Statutes.

Collateral references. —

73 Am. Jur. 2d, Statutes, § 164 et seq.

82 C.J.S., Statutes, § 548 et seq.

Sec. 01.10.070.
Time statutes become law and take effect.

All bills passed by the legislature become law upon the governor’s signature or upon the governor’s veto being overridden or, when the governor allows a bill to become law without signature, on the day after expiration of the period allowed for gubernatorial action by art. II, § 17 of the Alaska Constitution. Acts become effective 90 days after becoming law, unless the legislature, by concurrence of two-thirds of the membership of each house, provides for another effective date.

The actual effective date of an Act having no effective-date provision is determined by starting with the day after it is signed by the governor or the day after the governor’s veto is overridden or the day after expiration of the period allowed for gubernatorial action by art. II, § 17 of the Alaska Constitution, and counting 90 calendar days, the Act becoming effective at 12:01 a.m., Alaska Standard Time on the 90th day.

The actual effective date and time of an Act having an immediate-effective-date provision is 12:01 a.m., Alaska Standard Time, on the day after it is signed by the governor or on the day after the governor’s veto is overridden or on the day after expiration of the period allowed for gubernatorial action by art. II, § 17 of the Alaska Constitution.

An Act that specifies a definite effective date becomes effective at 12:01 a.m., Alaska Standard Time, on the date specified. However, if the specified definite effective date is on or before the day the governor signs the Act, the day the governor’s veto is overridden, or the last day of the period allowed for gubernatorial action by art. II, sec. 17, Constitution of the State of Alaska, as applicable, the Act becomes effective at 12:01 a.m., Alaska Standard Time, on the day after the governor signs the Act, the governor’s veto is overridden, or the period allowed for gubernatorial action by art. II, sec. 17, Constitution of the State of Alaska, expires, as applicable.

When the governor allows a bill to become law without signature, the governor shall give written notice of that fact to the legislature. The date of this notice does not affect the date the bill becomes law or the date the Act takes effect.

In this section,

“Act” means a bill which has become law;

“bill” means a legislative document proposing an Act;

“becomes effective” means becomes applicable; “effective date” does not mean date of enactment (or date of becoming law), although the two will coincide when a bill which has an immediate-effective-date provision is allowed to become law without the governor’s signature;

“becomes law” means is enacted; “enactment” occurs when any one of the following takes place:

a bill which is passed by the legislature is signed by the governor;

the period specified in art. II, § 17 of the Alaska Constitution expires without gubernatorial action;

the legislature overrides the governor’s veto of a bill;

“passed by the legislature” means that the required majority of each house of the legislature has taken final action in approving the same version of a bill.

History.

(§ 5 ch 62 SLA 1962; am § 8 ch 126 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 115 SLA 1974; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 2002)

Cross references. —

For federal law concerning standard time, see 15 U.S.C. 260-267.

Sec. 01.10.080.
Computation of time.

The time in which an act provided by law is required to be done is computed by excluding the first day and including the last, unless the last day is a holiday, and then it is also excluded.

History.

(§ 6 ch 62 SLA 1962)

Administrative Code. —

For deregulation ballot: election procedure, see 3 AAC 49, art. 1.

Sec. 01.10.090.
Retrospective statutes.

No statute is retrospective unless expressly declared therein.

History.

(§ 7 ch 62 SLA 1962)

Opinions of attorney general. —

A law may be made retroactive without an immediate effective date; hence, in a law passed in 1989 making itself retroactive to January 1, 1989, the retroactivity provision was valid despite the fact that the effective date was ninety days after approval. On the date the law became effective it was to become retroactive to January 1, 1989. June 1, 1989 Op. Att’y Gen. (overruling March 31, 1988 Op. Att’y Gen. to the extent inconsistent with this conclusion).

Sec. 01.10.100.
Effect of repeals or amendments.

The repeal or amendment of a law does not release or extinguish any penalty, forfeiture, or liability incurred or right accruing or accrued under that law, unless the repealing or amending act so provides expressly. The law shall be treated as remaining in force for the purpose of sustaining any proper action or prosecution for the enforcement of the right, penalty, forfeiture, or liability.

The expiration of a temporary law does not release or extinguish a penalty, forfeiture, or liability incurred or right accruing or accrued under that law unless the temporary law so provides expressly, and that law shall be treated as still remaining in force for the purpose of sustaining any proper action or prosecution for the enforcement of the penalty, forfeiture, or liability or right accruing or accrued.

When an act repealing a former act, section, or provision is itself repealed, that repeal does not revive the former act, section, or provision, unless it is expressly so provided.

History.

(§ 19-1-1 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 4 ESLA 1955; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 1959)

Administrative Code. —

For eligibility for discretionary parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 1.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Section contemplates penal statute. 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

The DMV can take action against a person’s driver’s license after the repeal date of AS 28.22 (mandatory insurance) if the person owned or operated a motor vehicle without the required insurance before the repeal date.
June 28, 1988 Op. Att’y Gen.